Hawaii statutes.
[§200-12] Administration of state small
boat harbors. The department shall include a separate administrative unit
which shall administer the state small boat harbors and the state comprehensive
recreational boating program. The unit shall:

(1) Adopt necessary rules under section 200-4 for the
purposes of this section;

(2) Organize a comprehensive recreational boating
program; and

(3) Develop standard permits, and fees, for moorage
in state small boat harbors to comply with section 200-10. [L 1991, c 272, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next